Arkansas statutes. Title 10 General Assembly
Chapter 3 Committees
10-3-3202. Child Maltreatment Investigations Oversight Committee — Creation — Membership — Meetings — Definition.

There is created a legislative committee to be known as the “Child Maltreatment Investigations Oversight Committee” that shall review and evaluate:

The conduct of child maltreatment investigations completed by the Division of Children and Family Services of the Department of Human Services or the Crimes Against Children Division of the Division of Arkansas State Police; and

Service delivery to children and families involved in an investigation of child maltreatment.

All cases that are reviewed and evaluated under this section shall:

Be completed investigations of child maltreatment; and

Not be associated with a pending dependency-neglect case.

The Child Maltreatment Investigations Oversight Committee shall be composed of the following members:

The Director of the Division of Children and Family Services of the Department of Human Services, or his or her designee;

The Commander of the Crimes Against Children Division of the Division of Arkansas State Police, or his or her designee;

One (1) representative from the Governor's office, as selected by the Governor;

One (1) attorney who is employed as parent counsel;

One (1) dependency-neglect attorney ad litem;

One (1) attorney who:

Has experience representing parents in child welfare cases; and

Is not contracted by the state;

One (1) judge or justice, who may be a retired judge or justice;

One (1) current or former representative from the court-appointed special advocate program;

One (1) representative from a child advocacy center;

One (1) parent who was previously designated as a subject of the report.

As used in subdivision (b)(1)(J)(i) of this section, “subject of the report” means:

The offender;

The custodial and noncustodial parents, guardians, and legal custodians of the child who is subject to suspected maltreatment; and

The child who is the subject of suspected maltreatment;

The Chair of the Child Maltreatment Investigations Oversight Committee shall guide the Child Maltreatment Investigations Oversight Committee in its discussion, evaluation, and review of the:

Conduct of child maltreatment investigations completed by the Division of Children and Family Services of the Department of Human Services or the Crimes Against Children Division of the Division of Arkansas State Police; and

Service delivery to children and families involved in an investigation of child maltreatment.

Guidance from the Chair of the Child Maltreatment Investigations Oversight Committee under subdivision (d)(1)(A) of this section shall include without limitation:

Selection of closed child maltreatment cases to be considered by the Child Maltreatment Investigations Oversight Committee; and

Criteria by which to evaluate the conduct of child maltreatment investigations and service delivery under subdivisions (d)(1)(A)(i) and (ii) of this section.

A member of the General Assembly may submit a case to the Child Maltreatment Investigations Oversight Committee for discussion, evaluation, and review.

Staff for the meetings of the Child Maltreatment Investigations Oversight Committee shall be provided by the Bureau of Legislative Research.

The following persons may attend a meeting of the Child Maltreatment Investigations Oversight Committee:

No more than three (3) employees of the Department of Human Services who are selected by the Director of the Division of Children and Family Services of the Department of Human Services or by his or her designee who may be selected under subdivision (b)(1)(A) of this section;

No more than three (3) employees of the Crimes Against Children Division of the Division of Arkansas State Police who are selected by the Commander of the Crimes Against Children Division or by his or her designee who may be selected under subdivision (b)(1)(B) of this section;

No more than five (5) members of the General Assembly who are:

Not members of the Child Maltreatment Investigations Oversight Committee; and

Selected by the Chair of the Child Maltreatment Investigations Oversight Committee; and

A member of the General Assembly who submits a case to the Child Maltreatment Investigations Oversight Committee for discussion, evaluation, and review.

A member of the General Assembly who submits a case to the Child Maltreatment Investigations Oversight Committee shall not participate in any discussion, evaluation, or review of the case that occurs during a meeting of the Child Maltreatment Investigations Oversight Committee.

A.C.R.C. Notes. Acts 2017, No. 713, § 2, provided:

“(a)The membership of the Child Maltreatment Investigations Oversight Committee shall be determined within sixty (60) days of the effective date of this act [Aug. 1, 2017].

“(b)The Chair of the House Committee on Aging, Children and Youth, Legislative and Military Affairs and the Chair of the Senate Interim Committee on Children and Youth shall call the first meeting.

“(c)At the first meeting, the initial members of the Child Maltreatment Investigations Oversight Committee shall:

“(1)Determine by lot their respective staggered terms; and

“(2)Elect from its legislative membership the Chair of the Child Maltreatment Investigations Oversight Committee.”

Amendments. The 2019 amendment rewrote (b)(1); deleted the introductory language of former (b)(2) and redesignated the remainder of former (b)(2) as part of (b)(1); rewrote (b)(1)(M); inserted (b)(1)(N); redesignated and rewrote former (b)(1)(N) as (b)(1)(O); redesignated former (b)(1)(O) as (b)(1)(P); added (b)(1)(Q) through (b)(1)(S); added (b)(2) and (b)(3); redesignated former (d)(1) and (d)(2) as (d)(1)(A) and (d)(1)(B); added (d)(2); added (f); and updated internal references and made stylistic changes.

Except as otherwise provided under § 10-3-3202(f), the meetings of the Child Maltreatment Investigations Oversight Committee are closed and are exempt from public observance under the Freedom of Information Act of 1967, § 25-19-101 et seq.

Correspondence between Child Maltreatment Investigations Oversight Committee members and information considered by the Child Maltreatment Investigations Oversight Committee in furtherance of the goals of the Child Maltreatment Investigations Oversight Committee are exempt from public inspection and copying under the Freedom of Information Act of 1967, § 25-19-101 et seq.

(1)A member of the Child Maltreatment Investigations Oversight Committee may have access to and may disclose any child maltreatment record to the extent authorized by:

This subchapter;

The Child Maltreatment Act, § 12-18-101 et seq.; and

Any other law of this state concerning child maltreatment records.

Except as provided under subdivisions (c)(3) and (4) of this section, a member of the Child Maltreatment Investigations Oversight Committee shall not disclose to any other person:

Any child maltreatment record obtained during or in relation to a meeting of the Child Maltreatment Investigations Oversight Committee; and

The details of a discussion related to any child maltreatment record that occurs during or in relation to a meeting of the Child Maltreatment Investigations Oversight Committee.

A legislative member of the Child Maltreatment Investigations Oversight Committee, acting in his or her official capacity, may disclose information from a child maltreatment record that is obtained under this section to:

Federal, state, and local governmental entities, or any agent of such entities, that have a need for such information to carry out their responsibilities under law to protect children from maltreatment;

Acting in their official capacities under law to protect children, individual United States and Arkansas senators and representatives and their authorized staff members but only if they agree not to permit redisclosure of the information except for a legitimate state purpose to protect children from child maltreatment.

However, disclosure shall not be made to any public committee or legislative body; and

Acting in their official capacities under law to protect children, the Governor and the Governor's authorized staff members but only if they agree not to permit redisclosure of the information except for a legitimate state purpose to protect children from child maltreatment.

Information obtained under this section may be disclosed to the Governor by a member of the Child Maltreatment Investigations Oversight Committee who serves on the Child Maltreatment Investigations Oversight Committee as:

The representative from the Governor's office selected by the Governor under § 10-3-3202(b)(1)(C); or

The current or former member of the General Assembly appointed by the Governor under § 10-3-3202(b)(1)(P)(ii).

Amendments. The 2019 amendment added “Except as otherwise provided under §10-3-3202(f), the” in (a); and rewrote (c).

(1)A person commits the offense of unlawful disclosure of data or information under this subchapter if the person knowingly discloses data or information to a person to whom disclosure is not permitted by this subchapter.

The Child Maltreatment Investigations Oversight Committee shall submit its findings and recommendations contained in a report at least annually to the House Committee on Aging, Children and Youth, Legislative and Military Affairs and the Senate Interim Committee on Children and Youth.

The report shall not contain information that identifies:

Effective Dates. Acts 2005, No. 906, § 3: Mar. 16, 2005. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the American Institute of Certified Public Accountants' Statement on Auditing Standards Number 99 regarding the detection of fraud requires auditors to document unsubstantiated allegations of fraud in their working papers; that public disclosure of unsubstantiated allegations do not serve a public purpose and may cause irreparable harm to innocent individuals and public employees; and that this act is immediately necessary to prevent unnecessary and unintended harm. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2005, No. 2201, § 12: Apr. 13, 2005. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the Legislative Joint Auditing Committee and the Division of Legislative Audit provide essential auditing and investigative services to the General Assembly and the State of Arkansas; that to avoid confusion, the General Assembly finds it is necessary to combine the Arkansas Code provisions concerning the Division of Legislative Audit and the local audit section of the division in one Arkansas Code chapter; that to avoid certain undue hardships on public entities of the state, it is also necessary for the General Assembly to provide a basis of financial statement presentation for certain public entities; that the American Institute of Certified Public Accountants' Statement on Auditing Standards Number 99 regarding the detection of fraud requires auditors to document unsubstantiated allegations of fraud in their working papers; and that this act is immediately necessary because the General Assembly finds that the public disclosure of such unsubstantiated allegations do not serve a public purpose and may cause irreparable harm to innocent individuals and public employees. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Publisher's Notes. This subchapter, concerning the Division of Legislative Audit and the Legislative Auditor, was repealed by Acts 2005, No. 2201, § 11. The subchapter was derived from the following sources:

10-4-101. Acts 1955, No. 105, § 8; A.S.A. 1947, § 13-1501.

10-4-102. Acts 1955, No. 105, §§ 9, 17, 18; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 13-1502, 13-1510, 13-1511.

10-4-103. Acts 1955, No. 105, §§ 9, 11; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 13-1502, 13-1504.

10-4-104. Acts 1955, No. 105, § 11; A.S.A. 1947, § 13-1504.

10-4-105. Acts 1955, No. 105, §§ 10, 11; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 13-1503, 13-1504.

10-4-106. Acts 1955, No. 105, §§ 12, 16; 1983, No. 553, § 1; 1985, No. 258, § 4; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 13-1505, 13-1509; Acts 1987, No. 358, § 4; 1989, No. 580, § 1; 1989 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 146, § 4.

10-4-107. Acts 1955, No. 105, § 16; A.S.A. 1947, § 13-1509.

10-4-108. Acts 1955, No. 105, § 17; A.S.A. 1947, § 13-1510.

10-4-109. Acts 1955, No. 105, § 13; A.S.A. 1947, § 13-1506.

10-4-110. Acts 1955, No. 105, § 13; A.S.A. 1947, § 13-1506.

10-4-111. Acts 1955, No. 105, § 15; 1973, No. 96, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 13-1508; Acts 1993, No. 179, § 1; 2001, No. 1038, § 2; 2003, No. 1473, § 20.

10-4-112. Acts 1955, No. 105, § 20; A.S.A. 1947, § 13-1513.

10-4-113. Acts 1955, No. 105, § 22; A.S.A. 1947, § 13-1515.

10-4-114. Acts 1955, No. 105, § 19; 1975, No. 928, § 5; A.S.A. 1947, § 13-1512.

10-4-115. Acts 1955, No. 105, § 14; A.S.A. 1947, § 13-1507; Acts 1987, No. 436, §§ 1-3; 1987, No. 505, §§ 1-3.

10-4-116. Acts 1955, No. 105, § 21; A.S.A. 1947, § 13-1514.

10-4-117. Acts 1983, No. 449, §§ 1-3; 1983, No. 502, §§ 1-3; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 13-1525 — 13-1527.

10-4-118. Acts 1981, No. 221, § 1; 1981, No. 465, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 13-1524.

10-4-119. Acts 1987, No. 370, § 1; 1991, No. 247, § 1.

Sections 10-4-111 and 10-4-115 were also amended by Acts 2005, No. 1165, § 1 and No. 906, § 1 respectively, which were subsequently subject to this repeal.

Acts 2005, No. 906, § 1, effective March 16, 2005 amended §10-4-115(c)(2) as follows:

“(2)After any audit report has been presented to the Legislative Joint Auditing Committee members, that audit report and copies of any documents contained in the working papers of the division shall be open to public inspection, except:

“(A)Documents specifically exempted from disclosure under the Freedom of Information Act of 1967, §25-19-101 et seq.;

“(B)Unsubstantiated allegations obtained in complying with the provisions of the American Institute of Certified Public Accountants' Statement on Auditing Standards Number 99 or other professional guidelines regarding the detection of fraud; and

“(C)Documents which disclose auditing procedures and techniques as defined in subdivision (c)(3) of this section.”

Effective Dates. Acts 2005, No. 424, § 2: Mar. 2, 2005. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the provisions of this act are of critical importance to preserve the efficient operations of the Division of Legislative Audit and provide the flexibility needed to supply the General Assembly and the Legislative Joint Auditing Committee information vital and necessary to fulfill their constitutional and statutory mandates. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2005, No. 906, § 3: Mar. 16, 2005. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the American Institute of Certified Public Accountants' Statement on Auditing Standards Number 99 regarding the detection of fraud requires auditors to document unsubstantiated allegations of fraud in their working papers; that public disclosure of unsubstantiated allegations do not serve a public purpose and may cause irreparable harm to innocent individuals and public employees; and that this act is immediately necessary to prevent unnecessary and unintended harm. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2005, No. 1444, § 2: Mar. 31, 2005. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that Statement No. 34 of the Governmental Accounting Standards Board, ‘Basic Financial Statements — and Management's Discussion and Analysis — for State and Local Governments’, places undue burdens on many school districts within the State of Arkansas; that the school districts in the State of Arkansas already face many pressures and requirements regarding accountability and that another basis of financial statement presentation will meet the needs of the General Assembly, the Department of Education, the school districts, and the people of the State of Arkansas; and that this act is immediately necessary to assist school districts. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2005, No. 1524, § 2: Mar. 31, 2005. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that Statement No. 34 of the Governmental Accounting Standards Board, ‘Basic Financial Statements — and Management's Discussion and Analysis — for State and Local Governments’, places an undue burden on the prosecuting attorneys within the State of Arkansas; that prosecuting attorneys in the State of Arkansas already face many pressures and requirements and do not have adequate personnel to prepare financial statements as required by Statement No. 34, and another basis of financial statement presentation will meet the needs of the General Assembly, the Department of Education, the school districts, and the people of the State of Arkansas; and that this act is immediately necessary to assist prosecuting attorneys. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2005, No. 2201, § 12: Apr. 13, 2005. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the Legislative Joint Auditing Committee and the Division of Legislative Audit provide essential auditing and investigative services to the General Assembly and the State of Arkansas; that to avoid confusion, the General Assembly finds it is necessary to combine the Arkansas Code provisions concerning the Division of Legislative Audit and the local audit section of the division in one Arkansas Code chapter; that to avoid certain undue hardships on public entities of the state, it is also necessary for the General Assembly to provide a basis of financial statement presentation for certain public entities; that the American Institute of Certified Public Accountants' Statement on Auditing Standards Number 99 regarding the detection of fraud requires auditors to document unsubstantiated allegations of fraud in their working papers; and that this act is immediately necessary because the General Assembly finds that the public disclosure of such unsubstantiated allegations do not serve a public purpose and may cause irreparable harm to innocent individuals and public employees. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Publisher's Notes. This subchapter, concerning local audits, was repealed by Acts 2005, No. 2201, § 11. The subchapter was derived from the following sources:

10-4-201. Acts 1969, No. 286, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 13-1517.

10-4-202. Acts 1973, No. 191, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 13-209; Acts 1993, No. 484, § 1; 1993, No. 1276, § 2; 1999, No. 636, § 1.

10-4-203. Acts 1973, No. 191, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 13-209.

10-4-204. Acts 1973, No. 191, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 13-209.

10-4-205. Acts 1973, No. 191, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 13-209; Acts 1987, No. 436, §§ 1-3; 1987, No. 505, §§ 1-3.

10-4-206. Acts 1969, No. 619, §§ 5, 6; 1973, No. 191, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 13-209; Acts 1987, No. 207, § 1.

10-4-207. Acts 1961, No. 183, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 13-211.

10-4-208. Acts 1985, No. 29, §§ 1, 2; 1985, No. 66, §§ 1, 2; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 13-1528, 13-1529; Acts 1991, No. 4, § 1.

10-4-209. Acts 1985, No. 960, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 24-106.1.

10-4-210. Acts 1977, No. 248, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 13-1518.

10-4-211. Acts 1977, No. 248, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 13-1519.

10-4-212. Acts 1977, No. 248, § 3; A.S.A. 1947, § 13-1520.

10-4-213. Acts 1977, No. 248, §§ 3, 4; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 13-1520, 13-1521.

10-4-214. Acts 1977, No. 832, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 13-1522.1.

10-4-215. Acts 1977, No. 537, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 13-1523.

10-4-216. Acts 1973, No. 191, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 13-209.

10-4-217. Acts 1973, No. 191, § 1; 1975, No. 332, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 13-209.

10-4-218. Acts 1959, No. 422, § 10; A.S.A. 1947, § 13-210.

10-4-219. Acts 1991, No. 187, § 1.

Section 10-4-202 was also amended by Acts 2005, No. 424, § 1, effective March 2, 2005, to read as follows:

“10-4-202. Audits authorized — Independent audits.

“(a)The Legislative Auditor has the power and duty, acting through his or her duly authorized employees, to conduct audits of the records and accounts of all offices, officials, or employees of counties, municipalities, school districts, county school boards, and educational cooperatives.

“(b)Nothing contained in subsection (a) of this section shall be so construed as to abridge the right of any school district, or any educational cooperative to choose and employ accountants licensed and in good standing with the Arkansas State Board of Public Accountancy to conduct these audits and present financial statements in accordance with:

“(1)Regulations prescribed by the:

“(A)State Board of Education; or

“(B)Department of Education; or, in the alternative

“(2)The guidelines and format of the:

“(A)Government Accounting Standards Board;

“(B)American Institute of Certified Public Accountants; and

“(C)United States Government Accountability Office.

“(c)(1)Nothing contained in subsection (a) of this section shall be construed to abridge the right of a municipality to choose and employ accountants licensed and in good standing with the Arkansas State Board of Public Accountancy to conduct audits and present financial statements as outlined in this subsection.

“(2)(A)The financial statements shall be presented on a fund basis with, as a minimum:

“(i)The general fund and the street or road fund presented separately; with

“(ii)All other funds included in the audit presented in the aggregate.

“(B)The financial statements shall consist of:

“(i)A balance sheet;

“(ii)A statement of revenues (receipts); expenditures (disbursements), and changes in fund equity (balance);

“(iii)A comparison of the final adopted budget to the actual expenditures (disbursements) for the general fund and street or road fund of the entity; and

“(iv)Notes to the financial statements.

“(C)The report shall include as supplemental information a schedule of general fixed assets, including land, buildings, and equipment.

“(3)In the alternative, upon the adoption of an annual resolution by the governing body of the municipality or county, the audit may be performed in accordance with guidelines and format prescribed by the Government Accounting Standards Board, the American Institute of Certified Public Accountants, and the United States Government Accountability Office.

“(4)For the purposes of this section, an audit shall be planned, conducted, and the results of the work reported in accordance with generally accepted government auditing standards, if applicable.

“(d)(1)As an alternative to an audit, the Legislative Auditor may conduct an agreed-upon procedures engagement of the records and accounts of all municipal or county offices, officials, or employees.

“(2)Unless otherwise provided by law, the governing body of a municipality may choose and employ accountants licensed and in good standing with the Arkansas State Board of Public Accountancy to conduct agreed-upon procedures engagements.

“(3)For the purposes of this section, agreed-upon procedures engagements shall be conducted in accordance with standards established by the American Institute of Certified Public Accountants and subject to the minimum procedures prescribed by the Legislative Auditor.

“(e)The Legislative Joint Auditing Committee shall monitor the reports prescribed in this section to ensure that the reports meet the needs of the General Assembly, the public entities, and the general public.”

Section 10-4-205(a)(2) was also amended by Acts 2005, No. 906, § 2, effective March 16, 2005, to read as follows:

“(2)After any audit report has been presented to the Legislative Joint Auditing Committee members, that audit report and copies of any documents contained in the working papers of the Division of Legislative Audit shall be open to public inspection, except:

“(A)Documents specifically exempted from disclosure under the Freedom of Information Act of 1967, §25-19-101 et seq.;

“(B)Unsubstantiated allegations obtained in complying with the provisions of the Statement on Auditing Standards Number 99 of the American Institute of Certified Public Accountants or other professional guidelines regarding the detection of fraud; and

“(C)Documents which disclose auditing procedures and techniques as defined in subdivision (a)(3) of this section.”

Section 10-4-208 was also amended by Acts 2005, No. 1444, § 1, effective March 31, 2005, to read as follows:

“10-4-208. Audit of schools.

“(a)As used in this section:

“(1)‘Public funds’ means any funds, moneys, receivables, grants, investments, instruments, real or personal property, or other assets, liabilities, equities, revenues, receipts, or disbursements belonging to, held by or for, or passed through a school; and

“(2)‘School’ means any public school district, charter school, educational cooperative, or publicly supported entity having supervision over public educational entities.

“(b)(1)Except as provided in subdivision (b)(2)(A) of this section, the Legislative Auditor shall conduct audits of all schools and any transactions regarding public funds of the schools.

“(2)(A)(i)However, any school may retain the services of a licensed certified public accountant or a licensed accountant in public practice in good standing with the Arkansas State Board of Public Accountancy to conduct the annual financial audits in accordance with auditing standards generally accepted in the United States and Government Auditing Standards issued by the Comptroller General of the United States.

“(ii)The report shall include a report on internal control over financial reporting and on compliance and other matters based on an audit of financial statements performed in accordance with governmental auditing standards.

“(B)Every report of an annual financial audit shall be filed with the Legislative Auditor within ten (10) days of issuance to the board.

“(C)Nothing in this subsection limits the authority of the Legislative Auditor to conduct an audit of any school.

“(c)Regulatory Basis of Presentation.

“(2)The financial statements shall consist of the following:

“(A)A balance sheet;

“(B)A statement of revenues, expenditures, and changes in fund balances;

“(C)A comparison of the final adopted budget to the actual expenditures for the general fund of the entity and the special revenue fund of the entity; and

“(D)Notes to the financial statements.

“(3)The report shall include as supplemental information a schedule of capital assets, including land, buildings, and equipment.

“(4)The State Board of Education shall promulgate the rules necessary to administer the regulatory basis of presentation provided in this subsection.

“(d)Alternative Basis of Presentation.

“(2)The report shall include a report on internal control over financial reporting and on compliance and other matters based on an audit of financial statements performed in accordance with governmental auditing standards.

“(e)(1)The audit report and accompanying comments and recommendations shall be reviewed at the first regularly scheduled meeting following receipt of the audit report if the audit report is received by the board or governing body prior to ten (10) days before the regularly scheduled meeting.

“(2)If the audit report is received by the board or governing body within ten (10) days before a regularly scheduled meeting, the audit report may be reviewed at the next regularly scheduled meeting after the ten-day period.

“(3)The board or governing body shall take appropriate action relating to each finding and recommendation contained in the audit report.

“(4)The minutes of the board or governing body shall document the review of the findings and recommendations and the action taken by the board or governing body.”

Section 10-4-209 was also amended by Acts 2005, No. 1524, § 1, effective March 31, 2005, to read as follows:

“10-4-209. Prosecuting attorneys — Accounting system — Audit.

“(a)The Division of Legislative Audit shall assist the prosecuting attorneys and their deputies in developing an accounting system for funds received or disbursed by virtue of their office.

“(b)The Legislative Auditor shall conduct audits of prosecuting attorneys in the State of Arkansas and any transaction regarding public funds of prosecuting attorneys.

“(c)Regulatory Basis of Presentation.

“(1)For prosecuting attorney financial audits, the financial statements shall be presented on a fund basis format with, as a minimum, the general fund presented separately and all other funds included in the audit presented in the aggregate.

“(2)The financial statements shall consist of the following:

“(A)A balance sheet;

“(B)A statement of revenues (receipts), expenditures (disbursements), and changes in fund equity (balance); and

“(C)Notes to the financial statements.

“(3)The report shall include as supplemental information a schedule of capital assets, including land, buildings, and equipment.”

Sections 10-4-213 and 10-4-217 were also amended by Acts 2005, No. 1165, §§ 2 and 3, effective August 12, 2005. The amended sections were subsequently subject to repeal by Acts 2005, No. 2201, § 11, effective April 13, 2005.

Cross References. Legislative Joint Auditing Committee, §10-3-401 et seq.

Preambles. Acts 1979, No. 111 contained a preamble which read:

“Whereas, the Legislative Joint Auditing Committee is charged with the responsibility of reviewing the audits prepared by the Division of Legislative Audit on the following governmental entities — counties, municipalities and school districts; and

“Whereas, there is substantial compliance in most areas of the fiscal operations of these governmental units but there are certain continuing deficiencies that have been denoted by these audit reports to be in noncompliance with the statutory laws of the State of Arkansas; and

“Whereas, the Legislative Joint Auditing Committee believes that the public interest is better served by compliance with the laws of the State of Arkansas with said compliance benefiting not only the public officials and the auditing staff but should result in additional benefits in the expenditure of public funds; and

“Whereas, there is no acceptable compliance mechanism now provided for by law for the enforcement of fiscal management laws in the State of Arkansas;

“Now, therefore….”

Effective Dates. Acts 1979, No. 111, § 10: Feb. 13, 1979. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the 72nd General Assembly that the Legislative Joint Auditing Committee should immediately implement this compliance procedure provided herein and that such compliance by all interested parties will accrue to the benefit of the taxpayers of the State of Arkansas; therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and it is necessary for the public peace, health and safety that this act be effective from and after the date of its passage and approval.”

Acts 2015, No. 557, § 9: Aug. 1, 2015.

One (1) adult who was previously in the custody of the state as a foster child due to a true finding of child maltreatment or neglect;

One (1) current foster parent;

(i)The Chair of the House Committee on Aging, Children and Youth, Legislative and Military Affairs or his or her designee.

The Chair of the House Committee on Aging, Children and Youth, Legislative and Military Affairs shall be a nonvoting ex officio member of the Child Maltreatment Investigations Oversight Committee if he or she appoints a designee under subdivision (b)(1)(M)(i) of this section;

(i)The Chair of the Senate Interim Committee on Children and Youth or his or her designee.

The Chair of the Senate Interim Committee on Children and Youth shall be a nonvoting ex officio member of the Child Maltreatment Investigations Oversight Committee if he or she appoints a designee under subdivision (b)(1)(N)(i) of this section;

Two (2) members of the General Assembly who are members of the:

House Committee on Aging, Children and Youth, Legislative and Military Affairs; or

Senate Interim Committee on Children and Youth;

(i)One (1) current or former member of the General Assembly who is a current or former member of the:

House Committee on Aging, Children and Youth, Legislative and Military Affairs; or

Senate Interim Committee on Children and Youth.

The current or former member of the General Assembly under subdivision (b)(1)(P)(i) of this section shall be appointed by the Governor;

The Director of the Dependency-Neglect Attorney Ad Litem Program or his or her designee;

An attorney who practices dependency-neglect appellate law, who shall be selected by the Chair of the Child Maltreatment Investigations Oversight Committee; and

The Executive Director of the Commission for Parent Counsel or his or her designee.

Unless otherwise provided under this section, the members listed under subdivisions (b)(1)(A)-(S) of this section shall be selected by the Chair of the House Committee on Aging, Children and Youth, Legislative and Military Affairs and the Chair of the Senate Interim Committee on Children and Youth in consultation with members of the House Committee on Aging, Children and Youth, Legislative and Military Affairs and the Senate Interim Committee on Children and Youth.

The members of the Child Maltreatment Investigations Oversight Committee annually shall elect from their legislative membership the Chair of the Child Maltreatment Investigations Oversight Committee.

(1)Members of the Child Maltreatment Investigations Oversight Committee shall serve three-year staggered terms.

(A)A current or former legislative member of the Child Maltreatment Investigations Oversight Committee shall serve for a term that expires following the general election that occurs after he or she is chosen to serve on the Child Maltreatment Investigations Oversight Committee, and until his or her replacement is selected or appointed under this section.

A current or former legislative member of the Child Maltreatment Investigations Oversight Committee under subdivision (c)(2)(A) of this section may be appointed or selected to serve consecutive terms.

History.

Acts 2017, No. 713, § 1; 2019, No. 1081, §§ 1-4.

10-3-3203. Confidentiality — Unlawful disclosure.

Unlawful disclosure of data or information under this subchapter is a Class A misdemeanor.

History.

Acts 2017, No. 713, § 1; 2019, No. 1081, §§ 5, 6.

10-3-3204. Report.

A subject of a report of child maltreatment; or

The person who made the report of child maltreatment.

History.

Acts 2017, No. 713, § 1.

10-3-315. Information and records.

10-3-421. [Repealed.]

Subchapter 5

— Joint Budget Committee

10-3-505. [Repealed.]

10-3-507. Presession budget hearings.

10-3-820. Joint Interim Committee on Energy — Members — Duties.

Subchapter 10

— Committees on Education

10-3-1002. [Repealed.]

10-3-1111. Disbursing officer.

10-3-1202. Acts 1975, No. 326, § 3; 1975 (Extended Sess., 1976), No. 1059, § 1; 1977, No. 884, § 21; A.S.A. 1947, § 5-1420.

10-3-1204. Acts 1975, No. 326, § 3; 1975 (Extended Sess., 1976), No. 1059, § 1; 1977, No. 884, § 21; A.S.A. 1947, § 5-1420.

Subchapter 13

— Senate Interim Committee on Children and Youth

10-3-1320. Interim operation — Vacancies.

10-3-1502. [Expired.]

10-3-1504. [Expired.]

10-3-1506. [Repealed.]

10-3-2002. Acts 2003, No. 1392, § 2.

Subchapter 21

— Continuing Adequacy Evaluation Act of 2004

10-3-2302. [Expired.]

Subchapter 24

— Arkansas Legislative Task Force on Higher Education Remediation, Retention, and Graduation Rates

Subchapter 25

— Arkansas Cyberinfrastructure Task Force Act

Subchapter 26

— Arkansas Legislative Task Force on Autism Act

Subchapter 28

— Legislative Task Forces Concerning Criminal Justice

10-3-2802. Interagency Task Force for the Implementation of Criminal Justice Prevention Initiatives. [Expired.]